California statutes. Education Code
(g) One representative of business and industry selected by the Industry Education Council of California.

(h) One representative of California labor, selected by the California branch of the American Federation of Labor-Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO).

(i) One representative of the National Science Supervisors Association.

(j) One representative of a national laboratory, selected by the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52958.

The project shall establish criteria for approval of science projects. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the extent to which:

(a) The science project addresses the need to integrate existing standards of science competence in the curriculum at each school level.

(b) The science project establishes clear and informed approaches to the needs of women and minorities for continuing with those science courses required to enhance future career options.

(c) The science project is designed to expand the base of scientific knowledge and the repertoire of teaching techniques of participating teachers and their colleagues in science teaching, and the scientific knowledge of students attending the classes they attend.

(d) Neighboring institutions have worked collaboratively to develop a proposal which clearly indicates their intention to continue to work cooperatively through the duration of the project.

(e) Participating districts, colleges, universities, businesses, federal laboratories, and individual scientists intend to provide financial and personnel support for the science project.

(f) Selection of participating teachers will create school-based or district-based teams of leaders for improvement of science education at all grade levels. 

(g) Participating districts, colleges, universities, and businesses intend to use the expertise of participating teachers for leadership among their teaching colleagues.

(h) The science project provides continuing science education to teachers in the public schools.

(i) Scientists in both the public and private sector are recruited to enhance the science project by providing facilities or personnel support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52959.

Proposals for science projects which meet the criteria specified in Section 52958 shall be submitted to the advisory committee for review and recommendation. The advisory committee shall establish procedures to assure that individuals reviewing a specific proposal do not submit the proposals for a science project. The Regents of the University of California shall provide funding to projects which, as a group, provide a comprehensive approach to solving the problems identified in Section 52951.

Agencies eligible to submit a proposal for a project shall include, but are not limited to, school districts, county superintendents of schools, colleges, universities, and national laboratories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52961.

The Educational Technology Committee and the State Board of Education shall give careful consideration to funding proposals for classroom application utilizing computers, videos, and other educational technology which would enhance the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52962.

The advisory committee shall develop criteria for evaluating each project. The criteria shall include at least the following elements:

(a) The change in science knowledge and pedagogical techniques for teaching science of participating teachers served by the local project.

(b) Participants’ attitudes towards the effectiveness of the local project.

(c) Changes in classroom behavior and perceived in-class teaching effectiveness.

(d) Participants’ contribution to ongoing teacher retraining and in-service programs.

(e) Any change in the students’ knowledge of science due to their teacher’s participation in the science project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52964.

(a) The executive director of the project and the advisory committee shall secure the maximum amount of funding available from the federal government, universities and colleges, school districts, county boards of education, the State Department of Education, and the private sector. The funding may be provided through in-kind contributions.

(b) To the extent possible, training provided to teachers shall be eligible for credit through the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52965.

This article does not apply to the University of California unless the regents, by resolution, make these provisions applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Comprehensive Reading Leadership Program [53000. - 53006.]

53000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Comprehensive Reading Leadership Program Act of 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that strong leadership is needed at the local level to improve reading instruction in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, of the public schools. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage members of governing boards of school districts, school administrators, and teachers identified by the governing board of the school district as having demonstrated leadership in reading instruction to implement a comprehensive reading program for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, that emphasizes basic reading skills and continued improvement of reading skills through the reading of high quality books.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53002.

(a) County offices of education may apply to the State Board of Education to design a reading leadership program and develop materials that focus on systematically explicit phonics instruction, phonemic awareness, sound-symbol relationships, decoding, word-attack skills, spelling instruction, diagnosis of reading deficiencies, research on how children learn to read, research on how proficient readers read, the structure of the English language, relationships between reading, writing, and spelling, planning and delivery of appropriate reading instruction based on assessment and evaluation, and independent pupil reading of high quality books and the relationship of that reading to improved reading performance.

(b) From the applications received pursuant to this section, the State Board of Education shall select one county office of education that has a proposed reading leadership program and a proposed materials development program that, in the judgment of the State Board of Education, will provide an effective reading leadership training program addressing the elements listed in subdivision (a) of this section and meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 53003. The State Board of Education is hereby authorized to allocate from moneys appropriated to it an amount sufficient to fund the reading leadership program selected pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53003.

From the applications received pursuant to this chapter, the State Board of Education shall select county offices of education and school districts on a statewide basis to conduct reading leadership training programs pursuant to the program developed pursuant to Section 53002. The State Board of Education shall select an applicant in accordance with the following criteria:

(a) The selected applicants shall have the qualifications necessary to deliver a high-quality reading leadership training program.

(b) The selected applicants shall represent all areas of the state so that each geographical area of the state has reasonable access to a reading leadership training program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53004.

From the amount appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, the State Board of Education shall determine the amount of funds to allocate to each school district and county office of education selected pursuant to Section 53003 to provide reading leadership training programs according to criteria established by the State Board of Education that is based on the actual cost of providing the leadership program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53005.

The State Board of Education shall designate the school districts and county offices of education that will be served by each of the reading leadership training program providers selected pursuant to Section 53003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

53006.

The county offices of education and school districts selected pursuant to Section 53003 shall conduct reading leadership training programs in accordance with the following:

(a) The members of the governing boards of the school districts, administrators of school districts and schools, and teachers who have been identified by the governing boards of the school districts as having demonstrated leadership in reading instruction in each school district to be served, as determined pursuant to Section 53004, shall be invited to participate in the reading leadership training program.

(b) The reading leadership training programs shall adhere to the program designs and use the materials produced pursuant to Section 53002.

(c) The reading leadership training programs shall address systematically explicit phonics instruction, phonemic awareness, sound-symbol relationships, decoding, word-attack skills, spelling instruction, diagnosis of reading deficiencies, research on how children learn to read, research on how proficient readers read, the structure of the English language, relationships between reading, writing, and spelling, planning and delivery of appropriate reading instruction based on assessment and evaluation, and independent pupil reading of high quality books and the relationship of that reading to improved reading performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15.5. Screening for Risk of Reading Difficulties [53008. - 53009.5.]

53008.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that screening pupils for risk of reading difficulties, including dyslexia, is one of many tools that educators can employ to gain information about how to support their pupils’ learning. Screening should be considered part of a school’s comprehensive instructional strategy, and should be used by educators like other types of formative and summative assessments: to inform individualized instruction, measure a pupil’s progress, identify pupil learning needs, and enable parents and educators to discuss pupil needs in a more informed way.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that early identification and intervention with evidence-based early literacy instructional strategies and materials
 improves literacy outcomes for pupils at risk of, and with, reading difficulties, including dyslexia. Dyslexia is the most common learning disability; however, many pupils on the dyslexia spectrum struggle every day to read without proper identification and support. By screening all pupils for risk of reading difficulties early, California can help families and teachers achieve the best learning and life outcomes for all pupils and close academic achievement gaps.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies be provided funding to offset costs related to administering pupil screenings pursuant to this section if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this section contains costs mandated by the state, pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) On or before January 31, 2024, the state
 board shall appoint an independent panel of experts for the purpose of creating an approved list of evidence-based, culturally, linguistically, and developmentally appropriate screening instruments for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2 to assess pupils for risk of reading difficulties, including possible neurological disorders such as dyslexia, pursuant to this section. The state board shall not appoint any person to the panel of experts with a financial interest in the screening instruments under consideration. The state board shall establish a review process, including how screening instruments will be evaluated against the criteria specified in subdivision (g), for the panel to use to evaluate and approve screening instruments. This subdivision does not prohibit the state board from periodically reconstituting this expert panel or updating the review process, nor does it prohibit the expert panel from periodically amending the list of screening instruments described in subdivision (c) at the
 request of the state board.

(c) (1) The work of the panel of experts appointed by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b) is subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and all meetings of the panel are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act.

(2) On or before December 31, 2024, the panel of experts appointed by the state board shall, at a regularly scheduled public meeting, vote to approve a list of screening instruments pursuant to the review process and evaluation criteria established by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b). The list shall include screening instruments that are developed both for English-speaking pupils and for non-English speaking pupils, in languages reflecting the primary languages of pupils in the state,
 to the extent assessments in those languages are available. The panel of experts shall also identify information about the appropriate administration of each screening instrument, including the appropriate grade or grades for administration of each screening instrument.

(d) On or before June 30, 2025, the governing board or body of a local educational agency serving pupils in kindergarten or grades 1 or 2 shall adopt, at a public meeting, one or more screening instruments from the list adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) to assess pupils for risk of reading difficulties pursuant to this section. The screening instrument or instruments adopted shall provide assessments for both English-speaking pupils and non-English speaking pupils, in languages reflecting the primary languages of pupils in the local educational agency, to the extent assessments in those languages are available.

(e) (1) Commencing no later than the 2025–26 school year, and annually thereafter, a local educational agency serving pupils in kindergarten or grades 1 or 2 shall assess each pupil in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2 for risk of reading difficulties using the screening instrument or instruments adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (d), unless the pupil’s parent or guardian opts out of the screening in writing.
 Employees administering screening instruments shall be appropriately trained to administer the instrument.

(2) In determining when during the school year to administer each screening instrument, a local educational agency shall consider whether pupils have received sufficient instruction in foundational reading skills to support a valid assessment. For the purposes of identifying pupils at risk of reading difficulties pursuant to paragraph (1), a local educational agency shall not administer a screening instrument to a kindergarten pupil before the 91st schoolday of the school year. This paragraph does not prohibit local educational agencies from administering more than one pupil screening or diagnostic evaluation annually in addition to those administered for the purposes of identifying pupils at risk of reading difficulties pursuant to
 paragraph (1), as appropriate.

(3) In order to ensure the accuracy and precision of screening, and in accordance with the administration instructions for each screening instrument adopted pursuant to subdivision (c), local educational agencies are strongly recommended to administer screening instruments on a one-on-one or small group basis.

(4) On or before January 31, 2027, the department shall develop and disseminate guidance to local educational agencies regarding the implementation of paragraph (2), including factors that may be considered in determining whether a pupil has received sufficient instruction in foundational reading skills to support a valid assessment. The guidance shall be informed by diverse research regarding screening administration and factors
 affecting the predictive validity of reading difficulties risk screening, as well as by the first year of implementation of reading difficulties risk screening pursuant to this section with data from all of the screening instruments approved by the expert panel described in subdivision (c).

(f) If a pupil enrolls for the first time in kindergarten or grades 1 or 2 after the screening instrument or instruments have been administered to all pupils in the given grade in that school year pursuant to subdivision (e), the local educational agency shall assess the pupil using the screening instrument or instruments adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (d) within 45 calendar days of enrollment, unless the pupil’s parent or guardian opts out of the screening in writing, or unless the parent or guardian provides documentation or the local educational agency has
 documentation that the pupil has had a similar screening in their prior school for their current grade and the parent or guardian was made aware of the results.

(g) (1) To support the adoption of high-quality screening instruments that minimize the overidentification or underidentification of pupils’ risk of reading difficulties, and offer meaningful information for followup, the state board shall consider the extent to which a screening instrument addresses the following factors when adopting evaluation criteria pursuant to subdivision (b):

(A) Use of direct measurement, supplemented by other pupil data, to determine if a pupil is at risk of a reading difficulty, including dyslexia.

(B) Measurement of domains that may predict dyslexia and other reading disorders, including, but not limited to,
 measures of oral language, phonological and phonemic awareness, decoding skills, letter-sound knowledge, knowledge of letter names, rapid automatized naming, visual attention, reading fluency, vocabulary, and language comprehension.

(C) Evidence that the tool is normed and validated using a contemporary multicultural and multilanguage sample of pupils, with outcome data for pupils whose home language is a language other than English as well as those who are native English speakers.

(D) Integration of relevant pupil demographic information, such as home language, English language fluency, and access to prekindergarten education, to more fully understand a pupil’s performance.

(E) Guidance and resources for educators regarding how to administer screening instruments, interpret results, explain results to families,
 including in pupils’ primary languages, and determine further educational strategies, assessments, diagnostics, and interventions that should be considered and that are specific to each type of pupil result. Guidance and resources provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall be informed by the English Language Arts/English Language Development Framework for California Public Schools developed pursuant to Section 60207 and the California Dyslexia Guidelines developed pursuant to Section 56335, as well as knowledge of effective interventions for the specific needs of individual pupils, and shall reflect a tiered interventions model aligned with the Multi-Tiered Systems of Support.

(2) Assessments administered pursuant to this section shall not be considered an evaluation or diagnostic tool to establish eligibility for special education and related services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et
 seq.), or an evaluation to determine eligibility for a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794). However, assessments administered pursuant to this section shall not be used to delay the child find process required under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. Additionally, assessments administered pursuant to this section may be used by a local educational agency to recommend that a pupil receive further assessment and evaluation to establish eligibility for special education and related services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, or to determine eligibility for a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.

(h) Pupils who do not speak sufficient English to be screened with an English-language instrument shall be screened pursuant to this section in their primary language if a screening instrument in their primary
 language approved pursuant to subdivision (c) is available. If a screening instrument is not available in at least one language in which a pupil is proficient, before the pupil can be screened, the pupil’s risk for reading difficulties shall be evaluated through an analysis of the pupil’s developmental history, educational history, and literacy progress, taking into account the pupil’s home background and evolving English language abilities, including speaking, listening, reading, spelling, and writing, consistent with the California Dyslexia Guidelines. Components of screening instruments that do not require English language proficiency may be used in this evaluation. When a pupil acquires sufficient English language knowledge and fluency to be able to be assessed using a screening instrument pursuant to this section, or if a screening instrument in their primary language becomes available, the local educational agency shall assess that pupil using the appropriate screening instrument.

(i) A pupil may be exempted from the requirements of this section with the prior written consent of the parent or guardian if any of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The pupil has a current identification or diagnosis of a reading difficulty, reading disorder, or other disability.

(2) The pupil is eligible for special education and related services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.

(3) The pupil is in the process of being assessed for eligibility for special education and related services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the
 pupil is being evaluated with diagnostic assessments that make screening pursuant to this section redundant.

(j) A local educational agency shall provide parents or guardians of pupils eligible for screening pursuant to this section with information about the screening, including the date or dates of the screening and instructions for how parents or guardians can opt out of the screening on behalf of their child, no later than 15 calendar days before the administration of the screening instrument or instruments. A local educational agency is encouraged to provide information about screening pursuant to this section with other back-to-school materials at the beginning of the school year.

(k) Pupil results from assessments administered pursuant to this section shall be made available to the pupil’s parent or guardian in a timely manner, but no more than 45 calendar days from the
 date the assessment was administered. These results shall include information about how to interpret the results, as well as the next steps pursuant to subdivision (l), if applicable.

(l) Screening results shall be used as a flag for potential risk of reading difficulties, not as a diagnosis of a disability. Results from a screening instrument shall be used as part of a broader process that further evaluates pupil needs and progress, identifies supports for classroom instruction, enables targeted individual intervention as needed, and allows for further diagnosis if concerns do not resolve. Accordingly, if a pupil is identified as being at risk of having reading difficulties after being screened pursuant to this section, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with supports and services, appropriate to the specific challenges identified by the screening instrument and other pertinent information about the pupil, which
 may include, among other supports and services, any of the following:

(1) Evidence-based literacy instruction focused on the pupil’s specific needs.

(2) Progress monitoring.

(3) Early intervention in the regular general education program.

(4) One-on-one or small group tutoring.

(5) Further evaluation or diagnostic assessment.

(m) Results of an assessment administered pursuant to this section shall not be used for any high-stakes purpose, including, but not limited to, teacher or other school staff evaluation, accountability, pupil grade promotion or retention, identification for gifted or talented education, reclassification
 of English learners, or identification as an individual with exceptional needs.

(n) Notifications to parents or guardians provided pursuant to this section shall comply with the translation requirements set forth in Section 48985.

(o) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “English learner” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 306.

(2) “Kindergarten” shall not include transitional kindergarten, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 48000.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(4) “Reading difficulties”
 means a barrier that impacts a pupil’s ability to learn to read or improve reading abilities, including dyslexia.

(5) “Screening instrument” means a brief tool administered by an appropriately trained school employee, including, but not limited to, a certificated teacher of record, measuring discrete areas to determine pupils at risk of reading difficulties, including dyslexia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 114.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53008.5.

(a) The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, which is hereby established, in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section. Funds appropriated for this purpose are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(b) (1) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), two hundred twenty-five million ($225,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies for schools eligible pursuant to paragraph (2), to develop school literacy programs, employ and train literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists, and develop and implement interventions for pupils
 in need of targeted literacy support. Local educational agencies may opt not to participate in the program described pursuant to this subdivision by informing the department, by September 30, 2022, and via a form provided by the department, of their intent to decline program funds for their eligible schoolsites. Local educational agencies who receive funding pursuant to this section may also be eligible for the Reading and Literacy Supplementary Authorization Incentive Grant Program.

(2) Of the amount identified in paragraph (1), the department shall compute an amount per pupil enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive, at each eligible schoolsite, such that no local educational agency shall receive less than four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) per eligible schoolsite. Grant amounts shall be determined using 2021–22 school enrollment data determined as of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System
 Fall 1 Certification. Local educational agencies receiving an allocation of funds pursuant to this paragraph are encouraged to use these funds over the full grant period, through June 30, 2031. For purposes of allocations and apportionments under this paragraph, a locally funded charter school shall be included with the chartering authority.

(3) On or before June 30, 2024, and again on or before June 30, 2027, a recipient local educational agency shall submit an interim report to the department, and a final report on or before June 30, 2031, detailing how it used funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision. The department shall create a reporting template for the purposes of this requirement no later than December 31, 2022. Specifically, these reports shall include:

(A) How funds were used to employ literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists for its eligible schools.

(B) How funds were used to develop and implement school literacy programs.

(C) How expenditures impacted pupils’ literacy achievement, including for pupil subgroups.

(D) How the local educational agency plans to continue to fund literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists past the award period.

(E) Other metrics as determined by the department.

(4) On or before July 30, 2024, again on or before July 30, 2027, and again on or before July 30, 2031, the department shall provide the interim and
 final reports submitted by recipient local educational agencies to the grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) for an independent evaluation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.7.

(5) On or before December 31, 2025, again on or before December 31, 2028, and again on or before December 31, 2032, the department shall provide a comprehensive report to the Department of Finance, the state board, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature summarizing the data collected pursuant to paragraph (3) of this section and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 53008.7.

(c) (1) Of the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available for the department, in collaboration with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and subject to the approval of the
 executive director of the state board, to select a county office of education, through a competitive process, to develop and provide training for educators to become literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists. The department shall prioritize applicants with demonstrated success in improving literacy, especially among underperforming pupil subgroups, as well as for those planning on partnering with institutions of higher education with demonstrated success in providing statewide professional development for expert literacy practice. Applicants who participate in the training established pursuant to this subdivision may also participate in the Reading and Literacy Supplementary Authorization Incentive Grant Program.

(2) The grantee selected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall do all of the following:

(A) Consider the preparation program standards set by the Commission on
 Teacher Credentialing for reading and literacy in developing the standards for educator training developed pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) Offer professional learning to educators at schoolsites funded pursuant to subdivision (b) and, as capacity allows, to other schoolsites.

(C) Provide funding for participating educators to pursue a Reading and Literacy Added Authorization, a Reading and Literacy Leadership Credential, a Bilingual Specialist Authorization, or any combination of those.

(3) Resources and training for literacy developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be coordinated with other state- and federally funded literacy initiatives to reduce duplication of effort and provide coordinated, streamlined access to literacy professional development and resources for educators and school leaders that are
 aligned with the curriculum framework for English Language Arts/English Language Development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap, the Literacy Roadmap, and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Eligible schoolsite” means an elementary schoolsite operated by a local educational agency with an unduplicated pupil percentage of 97 percent or greater for pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, based on 2021–22 Fall 1 census day pupil data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. The unduplicated pupil percentage for a schoolsite shall be calculated by the sum of the number of unduplicated pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals, English language learners, and youth in foster care, divided by
 each schoolsite’s total enrollment for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(2) “Employ” means that a local educational agency, to the extent feasible, will hire a new literacy coach, reading specialist, or both, train existing staff to become a literacy coach, or support existing staff in obtaining a reading specialist credential or authorization. Funds shall not be used to support the salaries of existing literacy coaches and reading specialists.

(3) “Local educational agency” means an elementary or unified school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(4) “School” and “schoolsite” means an elementary school of a local educational agency.

(5) “School literacy program” means a program that includes all of the following:

(A) A school literacy plan that includes goals and actions to improve literacy acquisition for pupils in preschool, if applicable, and kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive. The plan shall identify metrics to measure progress toward the goals and actions.

(B) At least one literacy coach or reading and literacy specialist per school to support educators and pupils in improving literacy instruction and pupil outcomes.

(C) Increased access to evidence-based literacy instruction, through strategies, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Providing bilingual reading specialists to support dual language acquisition and English language development programs.

(ii) Developing and implementing culturally responsive curriculum and instruction.

(iii) Providing professional development for educators and school leaders in literacy instruction and the use of data to identify and support struggling pupils.

(iv) Providing professional development for educators and school leaders regarding implementation of the curriculum framework for English Language Arts/English Language Development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207 and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(v) Establishing an evidence-based family literacy initiative, which may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Family literacy plans that identify literacy and biliteracy goals, benchmarks, and roles
 for all family members.

(II) Family literacy home visiting programs, including, but not limited to, “promotora” family literacy outreach specialists. Local educational agencies may establish literacy and biliteracy home visits to engage families in how to best support their pupils and every family member in reaching their literacy goals.

(III) Extended-day, summer, or weekend family institutes related to literacy and biliteracy. Local educational agencies are encouraged to work with in-house expanded learning programs to establish literacy and biliteracy support programs and literacy enrichment programs during after school, weekend, and summer hours.

(IV) Public library family literacy partnerships, including, but not limited to, digital tools to support whole family literacy.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 24.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53008.7.

(a) The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department to augment the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established pursuant to Section 53008.5. Funds appropriated for this purpose are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(b) (1) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), two hundred forty-eight million dollars ($248,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies for schools eligible pursuant to paragraph (2), to develop school literacy programs, employ and train literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists, and develop and implement interventions for pupils in need of targeted literacy
 support. Local educational agencies may opt not to participate in the program described pursuant to this subdivision by informing the department, by September 30, 2023, and via a form provided by the department, of their intent to decline program funds for their eligible schoolsites. Local educational agencies who receive funding pursuant to this section may also be eligible for the Reading and Literacy Supplementary Authorization Incentive Grant Program.

(2) Of the amount identified in paragraph (1), the department shall compute an amount per pupil enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive, at each eligible schoolsite, in a manner that also ensures that no local educational agency shall receive less than four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) per eligible schoolsite. Grant amounts shall be determined using 2022–23 school enrollment data determined as of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1